Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2727
Bonds; negotiability; sale.

(1) Except as the issuing city's governing body may otherwise provide, any bond and any attached interest coupons shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all purposes of article 8, Uniform Commercial Code.

(2) The bonds may be sold at public or private sale as provided by the city's governing body and at such price or prices as determined by such governing body.

Laws 1993, LB 732, § 4.